en: Platerines
es: Platerinas
fr: Nectarines plates, Platerines, Nectarine plate, Platerine
hr: Platerine
la: Prunus persica var. platerina
nl: Wilde perziken, Platte perziken

en: Flat peaches, Saturn peaches, Donut peaches, Doughnut peaches, Paraguayo peaches
ar: دراق مبلط
ca: Préssec pla
cs: Plochá broskev
de: Plattpfirsich
es: Paraguaya
et: Lamevirsik
fa: هلو انجیری
fi: Lattapersikka
fr: Pêches plates, Pêche plate
gl: Pexego chato
hy: Թզադեղձ
it: Pesca tabacchiera
ja: バントウ
ko: 납작 복숭아
la: Prunus persica var. platycarpa
ru: Инжирный персик
sl: Ploščata breskev
sr: Пљосната бресква
sv: Paraguayo
tg: Анҷиршафтолу
vi: Bàn đào
zh: 蟠桃

en: Peach pulp and peel
fr: Pulpe et peau de pêche

en: Nectarines
ar: زليقة
bg: Нектарини, Нектарина
ca: Nectarina
cs: Nektarinka
da: Nektariner
de: Nektarinen
el: Νεκταρίνι
eo: Nektarinoj
es: Nectarinas
et: Nektariin
eu: Brinoi
fa: شلیل
fi: Nektariinit
fr: Nectarines
gv: Naghtyreen
hr: Nektarine
hy: Նեկտարին
it: Pesca noce
ja: ネクタリン
ka: Ვაშლატამა
kv: Нектарин
la: Prunus persica var. nucipersica, Prunus persica var. nectarina
lb: Nektarinn
lt: Nektarinai, Nektarinas
nb: Nektariner
nl: Nectarines
nn: Nektarinar
pl: Nektarynka
pt: Nectarina
ru: Нектарин
se: Nektariidna
sk: Broskyňa obyčajná
sl: Nektarina
sv: Nektariner
tl: Nektarina
tr: Nektarin
uk: Нектарин
vi: Du đào
zh: 桃駁李

en: Fresh nectarines
da: Friske nektariner
fr: Nectarines fraîches
hr: Svježe nektarine
lt: Švieži nektarinai
sv: Färska nektariner

en: Nectarine pulp and peel
fr: Pulpe et peau de nectarine, Pulpe et peau de brugnon

en: Garofa nectarines
xx: Garofa
da: Garofa-nektariner
sv: Garofa-nektariner

en: Fresh Garofa nectarines
da: Friske Garofa-nektariner
sv: Färska Garofa-nektariner

en: Pitayas, Pitaya, Dragon Fruits, Dragon Fruit
de: Drachenfrüchte, Drachenfrucht
fr: Pitayas
hr: Pitaje
lt: Drakono vaisiai
nl: Pitajas, pitahajas, Drakenvruchten

en: Okra cooked without salt
fr: Gombo cuit

en: Medlars
de: Mispeln
es: Nísperos
fr: Nèfles
hr: Mušmule
la: Mespilus germanica
nl: Mispels

en: Melons
bg: Пъпеши
de: Melonen
es: Melones y sandías
fi: melonit
fr: Melons et pastèques
hr: Dinje, dinja
it: Meloni
ja: ウリ
lt: Melionai
nl: Meloenen en watermeloenen
ru: Тыквина

en: Muskmelons
de: Zuckermelonen
es: Melones, Melón
fi: myskikurpitsat
fr: Melons
hr: Mošusne dinje
ja: マスクメロン
la: Cucumis melo
nl: Suikermeloenen

en: Fresh muskmelons
fr: Melons frais

en: Branco melons, White melons
es: Melones Branco, Melones blancos
fr: Melons Branco, Melons blancs
hr: Branco dinje

en: Canary melons
es: Melones amarillos canarios, Melones amarillos españoles
fr: Melons Canary
hr: Kanarinske dinje

en: Cantaloupe melons, Cantaloupe
af: spanspek
ar: شمام
bo: ཧ་མི་ཀུབ།
ca: cantaloup, meló cantaloup
da: kantalupmelon
de: Cantaloupe-Melone, Kantalupe, Kantalupmelone, Warzenmelone
el: κανταλουπένσιος
eo: kantalupo
es: Melones Cantalupe, Melones Cantalupo, Melones Cantaloup, Melones Cantaloupe
fa: طالبی
fi: cantaloupe-meloni, cantaloupe
fr: Melons Cantaloup, Cantaloup
hi: खरबूजा
hr: Kamena dinja
ht: kantaloup
hy: կանտալուպ
id: blewah
it: melone di cantalupo
ja: カンタロープ
jv: bléwah
kk: канталупа, Kantalwpa, كانتالۋپا
kn: ಕರ್ಬೂಜ
ko: 캔털루프
ku: şemamok
la: Cucumis melo var. cantalupo
lt: Kantalupos melionai, raukšlėtasis melionas, raukšlėtieji melionai
mk: диња
ml: ഷമാം
mr: खरबूज
nb: cantaloupe
nl: Cantaloupes, Kanteloepmeloenen, Kantaloepmeloenen
nn: kantalupp
nv: taʼneeskʼání
pa: ਖਰਬੂਜਾ
pl: kantalupa
pt: melão-cantalupo, meloa
ro: cantalup
ru: канталупа
sv: nätmelon
te: ఖర్బుజా
th: แคนตาลูป
tl: milong kastila
uk: канталуп
vi: dưa vàng
zh: 哈密瓜

en: Charentais melons
es: Melones Charentais
fr: Melons Charentais
hr: Charentais dinje
nl: Charantais Meloenen

en: Cantaloupe melon pulp
fr: Pulpe de melon cantaloup

en: Galia melons
es: Melones Galia
fr: Melons Galia
hr: Galija dinje
nl: Galia meloenen